Utah statutes.
63H-1-301.   Authority board -- Delegation of power.

(1)  The authority shall be governed by a board which shall manage and conduct the business and affairs of the authority and shall determine all questions of authority policy.

(2)  All powers of the authority are exercised through the board.

(3)  The board may by resolution delegate powers to authority staff.



Amended by Chapter 92, 2009 General Session

